New York, session 2025-2026, S1194.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 12 of section 66 of the public service law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (m) to read as follows: 3 (m) In addition to any other requirements imposed by this section, 4 regarding an increase in rates or charges, as such terms are used in 5 paragraph (c) of this subdivision, the commission shall require all gas 6 and electric corporations to provide at least forty-five days' notice, 7 in writing, to each customer which such service is being provided to, 8 indicating to such customer that a rate or charge increase for services 9 will take effect. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01894-07-5